Hawaii statutes.
[§150A-11.5] Entry of private property for
enforcement. Whenever any member of the department of agriculture deems it
necessary for the protection of animal or public health, agriculture, or the
environment, to enter any land, building, vessel or aircraft for the purpose of
seizing, capturing, confiscating or removing any living creature that is
prohibited or restricted and without a permit, the member may make complaint to
the district judge in whose circuit the alleged violation is occurring, and the
district judge may thereupon issue a warrant, directed to any police officer of
the circuit, commanding the police officer to take sufficient aid, and being
accompanied by the member of the department, to go to the place described in
the complaint, and to seize, capture, confiscate or remove, under directions of
the member, the prohibited or restricted creature. [L 1992, c 229, §2]

Cross References

Entry to control or eradicate pests, see §141-3.6.

Previous
Vol02_Ch0046-0115
Next